New York, session 2025-2026, A5113.
do enact as follows:
Section 1. The insurance law is amended by adding a new section 7013
to read as follows:
§ 7013. Captive insurance for commuter vans, pre-arranged for-hire
vehicles, transportation network companies, and accessible vehicles.
(a) Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary pursuant to
subsection (b) of section seven thousand three of this article, commuter
vans, pre-arranged for-hire vehicles, transportation network companies,
and accessible vehicles that are engaged in the business of carrying or
transporting passengers for hire may create a group captive insurance
company or companies. The superintendent shall implement:
(1) standards for enrollment of eligible commuter vans, pre-arranged
for-hire vehicles, transportation network companies, and accessible
vehicles including mechanisms for determining eligibility; and
(2) standards for monitoring the performance of such captive insurance
company or companies in providing affordable insurance coverage to
commuter vans, pre-arranged for-hire vehicles, transportation network
companies, and accessible vehicles pursuant to subsection (c) of this
section.
(b) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have
the following meanings:
(1) "Commuter van" shall mean a commuter van service having a seating
capacity of nine passengers but not more than twenty-four passengers or
such greater capacity as the superintendent may establish by rule and
EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets
[ ] is old law to be omitted.
LBD06067-03-5

A. 5113--A 2
carrying passengers for hire. The term "commuter van" shall include, but
not be limited to, shuttles and transportation vans.
(2) "Pre-arranged for-hire vehicle" shall mean a motor vehicle that is
used in the business of transporting passengers for compensation on a
pre-arranged basis, and operated in such business under a license or
permit issued by a licensing jurisdiction. Such term shall include, but
not be limited to, small school buses pursuant to section one hundred
forty-two or sixteen hundred forty-two-a of the vehicle and traffic law.
The term "pre-arranged for-hire vehicle" shall apply to vehicles as
defined in this paragraph regardless of any other provision of local law
or rule defining or describing such vehicles by any other terms such as
school bus, charter bus, livery, taxi, black car, or luxury limousine.
(3) "Transportation network company" shall have the same meaning as
set forth in section sixteen hundred ninety-one of the vehicle and traf-
fic law.
(4) "Accessible vehicle" shall mean a vehicle that:
(A) complies with the accessibility requirements of the Americans with
Disabilities Act of 1990, as amended, and the regulations promulgated
thereunder;
(B) is equipped with a lift, ramp or any other device, arrangement or
alteration, so it is capable of transporting individuals who use wheel-
chairs, scooters, or other mobility aids while they remain seated in
their wheelchairs, scooters, or other mobility aids;
(C) is equipped with an assistive listening system for persons with
hearing impairments that is connected with any intercom, video or audio
system, when such a system is installed or designed and approved to
provide service to persons with disabilities;
(D) is equipped with standardized signs printed in: (i) braille; and
(ii) large-print text so that such signs are visible to persons with low
vision;
(E) provides sufficient floor space to accommodate a service animal;
(F) if powered by a hybrid-electric motor, is equipped with an appro-
priate device to enable persons who are blind to hear the approach of
the vehicle as readily as they can hear a conventional gasoline-powered
vehicle;
(G) shall include, but not be limited to, "ambulette" which shall have
the same meaning set forth in 17 NYCRR Part 720.8 or "paratransit" vehi-
cle which means a special-purpose vehicle, designed and equipped to
provide nonemergency transport, that has wheelchair-carrying capacity,
stretcher-carrying capacity, or the ability to carry disabled persons as
defined in section fifteen-b of the transportation law.
(c) Captive insurance companies created pursuant to this section shall
provide minimum limits and coverages as required by law. In addition,
all no fault insurance related to commuter vans, pre-arranged for-hire
vehicles, transportation network companies, and accessible vehicles
insured in this program will rely on the medical treatment guidelines
promulgated in existing workers' compensation law.
§ 2. Subdivision 8 of section 1229-c of the vehicle and traffic law,
as added by chapter 365 of the laws of 1984, is amended to read as
follows:
8. Non-compliance with the provisions of this section shall [not] be
admissible as evidence in any civil action in a court of law in regard
to the issue of liability [but] and may be introduced into evidence in
mitigation of damages provided the party introducing said evidence has
pleaded such non-compliance as an affirmative defense.
§ 3. This act shall take effect immediately.